src/fst/morphology/affixes/nouns.lexc
LEXICON x_12_lapsi        !!= @CODE@ lapsi la
  +Sg      :psi           nom_end         ; ! ^EI e to i
  +Sg      :psi           nom_R           ; ! ^EI e to i
  +Sg      :pse^WG        gen_n_sg        ;
  +Sg      :pse           gen_n_sg        ; ! should be ^WG?
  +Sg      :s             par_tA          ;
  +Sg      :pse^HMETA     ill_hVVn        ; ! e is for vowel copying, then e:0
  +Sg      :pse           ess_nA          ;
  +Sg      :pse^WG        sgpl_cases_even ; !! these two lexica for cases with

  +Pl      :pse^WG        nom_t           ;
  +Pl      :s             gen_ten         ; ! lasten
  +Pl+Dial/Por:ps%>i2%>i     gen_n           ; ! lapsiin
  +Pl+Dial/Jok:ps%>i2        gen_tten        ; ! lapsitten
  +Pl+Dial/Var:ps%>i2        gen_tten        ; ! lapsitten
  +Pl+Dial/Por:ps%>i2%>i     par_end         ; ! lapsii
  +Pl+Dial/Jok:ps%>i2%>      par_A           ; ! lapsia
  +Pl+Dial/Var:ps%>i2%>      par_A           ; ! lapsia
  +Pl      :ps^EDEL       ill_hiin        ;
  +Pl      :pse%>i2       ess_nA          ;
  +Pl      :ps%>i2        com_ne          ; ! kanskje pse
  +Pl      :ps^WG%>i2     sgpl_cases_even ; !! the same affix in sg and pl


LEXICON n_12_mies        !!= @CODE@ mies mie
+N         : x_12_mies ;

LEXICON x_12_mies        !!= @CODE@ mies mie
  +Sg      :s            nom_end         ; ! ^EI e to i
  +Sg      :s            nom_R           ; ! ^EI e to i
!          +Sg:he           gen_n           ; ! TODO, remove?
  +Sg      :he^WG        gen_n_sg        ;
  +Sg      :s            par_tA          ;
  +Sg      :h^HMETA      ill_hVVn        ;
  +Sg      :he           ess_nA          ;
  +Sg      :he^WG        sgpl_cases_even ; !! these two lexica for cases with

  +Pl      :he^WG        nom_t           ; ! TODO remove one of these
  +Pl      :he           nom_t           ; ! TODO remove one of these
  +Pl      :s            gen_ten         ;
  +Pl+Dial/Por:h%>i2%>i     gen_n           ; ! miehiin
  +Pl+Dial/Jok:h%>i2%>      gen_tten        ; ! miehitten
  +Pl+Dial/Var:h%>i2%>      gen_tten        ; ! miehitten
  +Pl+Dial/Por:h%>i2%>i     par_end         ; ! miehii
  +Pl+Dial/Jok:h%>i2%>      par_A           ; ! miehiä
  +Pl+Dial/Var:h%>i2%>      par_A           ; ! miehiä
  +Pl      :h            ill_hiin        ;
  +Pl      :he%>i2       ess_nA          ;
  +Pl      :h%>i2        com_ne          ;
  +Pl      :h^WG%>i2     sgpl_cases_even ; !! the same affix in sg and pl


LEXICON n_22 !!= @CODE@ tytär:tyttär, taival:taipal
! Encountered a problem for the dialect trigger order!
! "e:0 in consonant stems and illative plural"
! and other all rules want the order to be stem ^Var therest,
! but in _n_32 (and some other sublexica) we add an e in all
! conjjugations except in a few (sgnom, and sgpl gen, par).

! Added an e before the dialect triggers, which need to be added to the e:0 rule in twolc,
! but I think that in the longer run having a uniform structure for this will be better.

+N+Dial/Por:e^Por x_22 ;
+N+Dial/Var:e^Var x_22_Var ;
+N+Dial/Jok:e^Jok x_22 ;
+N+Sg      :^WG  nom_R      ;


! tyvenen (ja muut sg) toimii Twolc:ssä mutta ei yamleilla kun kompiloi, miks? katso e:0 twolc:ssä, lisää notes
LEXICON x_22 ! tyven
  +Sg      :^WG^E0       nom_end        ;
!  +Sg      :             gen_n_sg       ;
  +Sg      :^WG          gen_n_sg       ;
  +Sg      :^WG^E0       par_tA         ;
  +Sg      :^HMETA       ill_hVVn       ;
  +Sg      :             ess_nnA        ;
  +Sg      :             sgpl_cases_odd ;

  +Pl      :             nom_t          ;
  +Pl      :^WG          nom_t          ;
  +Pl+Dial/Por:%>i2%>i      gen_tten       ; ! tyttäriitten
  +Pl+Dial/Jok:%>i2         gen_tten       ; ! tyttäritten, mutta tyveniitten? TODO checking with Aili
  +Pl+Dial/Var:%>i2         gen_tten       ; ! tyttäritten, mutta tyveniitten? TODO checking with Aili
  +Pl+Dial/Por:%>i2         par_V          ; ! tyttärii
  +Pl+Dial/Por:%>i2%>i      par_tA         ; ! tyttäriitä
  +Pl+Dial/Jok:%>i2         par_A          ; ! tyttäriä
  +Pl+Dial/Var:%>i2         par_A          ; ! tyttäriä
  +Pl      :^HMETA       ill_hiin       ;
  +Pl      :%>i2         ess_nnA        ;
  +Pl+Dial/Por:%>i2         com_nne        ;
  +Pl+Dial/Var:%>i2         com_nne        ;
  +Pl+Dial/Jok:%>i2         com_nne        ; ! jok: tyveninne
  +Pl      :%>i2         sgpl_cases_odd ; ! hmm, tämä menee pieleen, sg ≠ pl

  LEXICON x_22_Var ! tyven
    +Sg      :^WG^E0       nom_end        ; ! tytär
    +Sg      :^WG^T0^E0    nom_end        ; ! tyär
  !  +Sg      :             gen_n_sg       ;
    +Sg      :^WG          gen_n_sg       ;
    +Sg      :^WG^E0       par_tA         ; ! tytärtä
   +Sg      :^WG^T0^E0    par_tA         ; ! tyärtä
    +Sg      :^HMETA       ill_hVVn       ;
    +Sg      :             ess_nnA        ;
    +Sg      :             sgpl_cases_odd ;

    +Pl      :             nom_t          ;
    +Pl      :^WG          nom_t          ;
    +Pl      :%>i2         gen_tten       ; ! tyttäritten, mutta tyveniitten? TODO checking with Aili
    +Pl      :%>i2         par_A          ; ! tyttäriä
    +Pl      :^HMETA       ill_hiin       ;
    +Pl      :%>i2         ess_nnA        ;
    +Pl      :%>i2         com_nne        ;
    +Pl      :%>i2         com_nne        ;
    +Pl      :%>i2         sgpl_cases_odd ; ! hmm, tämä menee pieleen, sg ≠ pl

LEXICON n_22_pl !!= @CODE@ tytär:tyttär, taival:taipal
! Encountered a problem for the dialect trigger order!
! "e:0 in consonant stems and illative plural"
! and other all rules want the order to be stem ^Var therest,
! but in _n_32 (and some other sublexica) we add an e in all
! conjjugations except in a few (sgnom, and sgpl gen, par).

! Added an e before the dialect triggers, which need to be added to the e:0 rule in twolc,
! but I think that in the longer run having a uniform structure for this will be better.

+N+Dial/Por:e^Por x_22_pl ;
+N+Dial/Var:e^Var x_22_Var_pl ;
+N+Dial/Jok:e^Jok x_22_pl ;
+N+Sg      :^WG  nom_R      ;


! tyvenen (ja muut sg) toimii Twolc:ssä mutta ei yamleilla kun kompiloi, miks? katso e:0 twolc:ssä, lisää notes
LEXICON x_22_pl ! tyven
  +Pl      :             nom_t          ;
  +Pl      :^WG          nom_t          ;
  +Pl+Dial/Por:%>i2%>i      gen_tten       ; ! tyttäriitten
  +Pl+Dial/Jok:%>i2         gen_tten       ; ! tyttäritten, mutta tyveniitten? TODO checking with Aili
  +Pl+Dial/Var:%>i2         gen_tten       ; ! tyttäritten, mutta tyveniitten? TODO checking with Aili
  +Pl+Dial/Por:%>i2         par_V          ; ! tyttärii
  +Pl+Dial/Por:%>i2%>i      par_tA         ; ! tyttäriitä
  +Pl+Dial/Jok:%>i2         par_A          ; ! tyttäriä
  +Pl+Dial/Var:%>i2         par_A          ; ! tyttäriä
  +Pl      :^HMETA       ill_hiin       ;
  +Pl      :%>i2         ess_nnA        ;
  +Pl+Dial/Por:%>i2         com_nne        ;
  +Pl+Dial/Var:%>i2         com_nne        ;
  +Pl+Dial/Jok:%>i2         com_nne        ; ! jok: tyveninne
  +Pl      :%>i2         sgpl_cases_odd ; ! hmm, tämä menee pieleen, sg ≠ pl

  LEXICON x_22_Var_pl ! tyven
    +Pl      :             nom_t          ;
    +Pl      :^WG          nom_t          ;
    +Pl      :%>i2         gen_tten       ; ! tyttäritten, mutta tyveniitten? TODO checking with Aili
    +Pl      :%>i2         par_A          ; ! tyttäriä
    +Pl      :^HMETA       ill_hiin       ;
    +Pl      :%>i2         ess_nnA        ;
    +Pl      :%>i2         com_nne        ;
    +Pl      :%>i2         com_nne        ;
    +Pl      :%>i2         sgpl_cases_odd ; ! hmm, tämä menee pieleen, sg ≠ pl

LEXICON n_22_m !!= @CODE@ elläin elläi yđin ydin
+N+Dial/Por:^Por x_22_m ;
+N+Dial/Var:^Var x_22_m ;
+N+Dial/Jok:^Jok x_22_m ;
+N+Sg      :^WGn nom_R    ;

LEXICON x_22_m !!= @CODE@
  x_22_m_sg ;
  x_22_m_pl ;
