src/fst/morphology/stems/nouns.lexc
LEXICON NounRoot !!= @CODE@
höyhän:höyhä n_22_m ;
hyöhän:hyöhä n_22_m ;
nimismies:nimis#mie n_12_mies ;
pajamies:paja#mie n_12_mies ;
poikamies:poika#mie n_12_mies ;
rauttiimies:rauttii#mie n_12_mies ;
matkamies:matka#mie n_12_mies ;
uimamies:uima#mie n_12_mies ;
saarnamies:saarna#mie n_12_mies ;
kauppamies:kauppa#mie n_12_mies ;
kossiimies:kossii#mie n_12_mies ;
saniteettisotamies:saniteetti#sota#mie n_12_mies ;
seppämies:seppä#mie n_12_mies ;
sotamies:sota#mie n_12_mies ;
partamies:parta#mie n_12_mies ;
puutyömies:puutyö#mie n_12_mies ;
kruuvamies:kruuva#mie n_12_mies ;
puhemies:puhe#mie n_12_mies ;
faakimies:faaki#mie n_12_mies ;
leskimies:leski#mie n_12_mies ;
pykimies:pyki#mie n_12_mies ;
velimies:veli#mie n_12_mies ;
tullimies:tulli#mie n_12_mies ;
merimies:meri#mie n_12_mies ;
postimies:posti#mie n_12_mies ;
poromies:poro#mie n_12_mies ;
tietomies:tieto#mie n_12_mies ;
hihtomies:hihto#mie n_12_mies ;
uittomies:uitto#mie n_12_mies ;
herrasmies:herras#mie n_12_mies ;
kirvesmies:kirves#mie n_12_mies ;
jahtimies:jahti#mie n_12_mies ;
hevosmies:hevos#mie n_12_mies ;
kulkumies:kulku#mie n_12_mies ;
koulumies:koulu#mie n_12_mies ;
apumies:apu#mie n_12_mies ;
ampumies:ampu#mie n_12_mies ;
kehämies:kehä#mie n_12_mies ;
ikämies:ikä#mie n_12_mies ;
lumimies:lumi#mie n_12_mies ;
pörämies:pörä#mie n_12_mies ;
päämies:pää#mie n_12_mies ;
pyytömies:pyytö#mie n_12_mies ;
transmies:trans#mie n_12_mies ;
transimies:transi#mie n_12_mies ;
työmies:työ#mie n_12_mies ;
tietyömies:tietyö#mie n_12_mies ;
vierasmies:vieras#mie n_12_mies ;
virkamies:virka#mie n_12_mies ;
ylkämies:ylkä#mie n_12_mies ;
mies:mie n_12_mies ;
neppain:nepp2ai n_22_m ;
härkin:härk#i n_22_m ;
kuolain:kuolai n_22_m ;
karfuunvaarain:karfuun#vaarai n_22_m ;
vaarain:vaarai n_22_m ;
sauvoin:sauvoi n_22_m ;
sierain:sierai n_22_m ;
kalvoin:kalvoi n_22_m ;
auvain:auvai n_22_m ;
koodiavvain:koodi#avvai n_22_m ;
avvain:avvai n_22_m ;
kuuđain:kuutai n_22_m ;
halkkein:halkk2ei n_22_m ;
aukkein:aukk2ei n_22_m ; ! XXX ?
esivanhin:esi#vanhi n_22_m ;
vanhin:vanhi n_22_m ;
maaterivanhiin:maateri#vanhii n_22_m ;
esivanhiin:esi#vanhii n_22_m ;
isovanhiin:iso#vanhii n_22_m ;
vanhiin:vanhii n_22_m ;
morssiin:morssii n_22_m ;
morssiin+Err/Orth:morsia n_22_m ;
poljin:polki n_22_m ;
vaađin:vaati n_22_m ;
hohđin:hohti n_22_m ;
hođin:hoti n_22_m ;
uistin:uisti n_22_m ;
luistin:luisti n_22_m ;
yđin:yti n_22_m ; ! ydin, (ydin with th)
tuomioistuin:tuomio#istui n_22_m ;
istuin:istui n_22_m ;
kytkyin:kytkyi n_22_m ;
kotielläin:koti#elläi n_22_m ;
peuraelläin:peura#elläi n_22_m ;
petoelläin:peto#elläi n_22_m ;
siitoselläin:siitos#elläi n_22_m ;
vesielläin:vesi#elläi n_22_m ;
ruokkoelläin:ruokko#elläi n_22_m ;
työelläin:työ#elläi n_22_m ;
vajeluselläin:vajelus#elläi n_22_m ;
villielläin:villi#elläi n_22_m ;
elläin:elläi n_22_m ;
tyyräin:tyyräi n_22_m ;
kevväin:kevväi n_22_m ;
askel:askel n_22 ;
kipen:kip2en n_22 ;
kyynel:kyynel n_22 ;
nivel:nivel n_22 ;
sammal:sammal n_22 ;
sävel:sävel n_22 ;
kapal:kappal n_22 ;
taival:taipal n_22 ;
porrasaskel:porras#askel n_22 ;
trappuaskel:trappu#askel n_22 ;
affen:affen n_22 ;
huomen:huomen n_22 ;
ijen:iken n_22 ;
pötäjäsiemen:pötäjä#siemen n_22 ;
siemen:siemen n_22 ;
paimen:paimen n_22 ;
vuosikymmen:vuosi#kymmen n_22 ;
kämmen:kämmen n_22 ;
ruumen:ruumen n_22 ;
klubinjäsen:klubi#njäsen n_22 ;
komiteajäsen:komitea#jäsen n_22 ;
komiteejäsen:komitee#jäsen n_22 ;
käsijäsen:käsi#jäsen n_22 ;
partiijäsen:partii#jäsen n_22 ;
perheenjäsen:perheen#jäsen n_22 ;
styyrinjäsen:styyrin#jäsen n_22 ;
jäsen:jäsen n_22 ;
järviahven:järvi#ahven n_22 ;
ahven:ahven n_22 ;
meriahven:meri#ahven n_22 ;
isosisar:iso#sisar n_22 ;
pikkusisar:pikku#sisar n_22 ;
suokerisisar:suokeri#sisar n_22 ;
puolisisaret:puoli#sisar n_22_pl ;
sisar:sisar n_22 ;
kuningatar:kuningattar n_22 ;
vanhaatytär:vanhaa#tyttär n_22 ;
jalkatytär:jalka#tyttär n_22 ;
krannitytär:kranni#tyttär n_22 ;
oppitytär:oppi#tyttär n_22 ;
ristitytär:risti#tyttär n_22 ;
pojantytär:pojan#tyttär n_22 ;
veljentytär:veljen#tyttär n_22 ;
sisarentytär:sisaren#tyttär n_22 ;
tyttärentytär:tyttären#tyttär n_22 ;
ruokkotytär:ruokko#tyttär n_22 ;
koulutytär:koulu#tyttär n_22 ;
puunatytär:puuna#tyttär n_22 ;
tytär:tyttär n_22 ; !!= * @CODE@
laiđun:laitu n_22_m ;
löitnantinsyđän:löitnantin#syđä n_22_m ;
